Wisconsin, session 2025, SB838.
do enact as follows:SB838,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB838,28Section 2. 20.455 (5) (dm) of the statutes is created to read:SB838,2,11920.455 (5) (dm) Trafficking victim services grant program. Biennially, the 10amounts in the schedule to provide grants to nonprofit organizations under s. 11165.925.SB838,312Section 3. 165.925 of the statutes is created to read:SB838,2,1313165.925 Trafficking victim services grant program. (1) In this section:SB838,2,1614(a) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization described in section 501 15(c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that is exempt from federal income tax 16under section 501 (a) of the Internal Revenue Code.SB838,2,1917(b) “Support services” means any combination of direct victim advocacy, 18safety planning, housing, substance use disorder treatment, medical and behavioral 19health, job training, and employment support services.SB838,2,2220(c) “Trafficking victim” means a person who was a victim of trafficking for the 21purposes of a commercial sex act, as defined in s. 940.302 (1) (a), under s. 940.302 or 22948.051 or under 22 USC 7101 to 7112.SB838,3,41(2) From the appropriation under s. 20.455 (5) (dm), the department of justice 2shall award grants to nonprofit organizations to provide support services to 3trafficking victims. To be eligible for a grant under this subsection, a nonprofit 4organization shall do all of the following:SB838,3,75(a) Submit an application for a grant to the department of justice that 6describes the organization’s efforts to coordinate with local law enforcement 7agencies and includes a proposed plan for expenditure of the grant moneys.SB838,3,98(b) Provide matching funds that are equal to at least 50 percent of the grant 9amount awarded under this subsection and that come from private funding sources.SB838,3,1110(3) The department of justice may award grants under sub. (2) in the 11following amounts:SB838,3,1312(a) To a nonprofit organization that provides among its services housing 13services, up to $125,000 per fiscal biennium.SB838,3,1514(b) To a nonprofit organization that provides only support services other than 15housing services, up to $50,000 per fiscal biennium.SB838,3,2016(4) (a) In awarding grants under sub. (2), the department of justice shall give 17preference to grant applicants that have a well-established relationship with local 18law enforcement agencies and to grant applicants that are capable of providing 19licensed services with licensed in-house staff or under a contract with a 3rd-party 20provider that oversees provision of licensed services.SB838,4,221(b) In awarding grants under sub. (2) to nonprofit organizations that provide 22housing services, the department of justice shall give preference to grant applicants 1that have the ability to provide services to the greatest number of trafficking 2victims.SB838,4,53(5) The department of justice shall promulgate rules for the administration of 4this section and the distribution of grants under this section, including developing 5additional criteria on which grant awards may be based.SB838,4,66